Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska80-332
Employees of Division of Veterans' Homes of Department of Health and Human Services; transfer; how treated.

On and after July 1, 2017, positions of employment in the Division of Veterans’ Homes of the Department of Health and Human Services related to the powers, duties, and functions transferred pursuant to the Nebraska Veterans Services Act are transferred to the Department of Veterans’ Affairs. For purposes of the transition, employees of the division shall be considered employees of the department and shall retain their rights under the state personnel system or pertinent bargaining agreement, and their service shall be deemed continuous. This section does not grant employees any new rights or benefits not otherwise provided by law or bargaining agreement or preclude the department or the director from exercising any of the prerogatives of management set forth in section 81-1311 or as otherwise provided by law. This section is not an amendment to or substitute for the provisions of any existing bargaining agreements.

Laws 2017, LB340, § 12.